test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-maksaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - maksā: # Noun 42 'eng /est maks ­a/fin' - full paradigm
     maksā+N+Sg+Nom: maksā
     maksā+N+Sg+Gen: maksā
     maksā+N+Sg+Par: maksõ
     maksā+N+Sg+Dat: maksān
     maksā+N+Sg+Ins: maksāks
     maksā+N+Sg+Ill: maksõ
     maksā+N+Sg+Ela: maksāst
     maksā+N+Pl+Nom: maksād
     maksā+N+Pl+Gen: maksād
     maksā+N+Pl+Par: maksīdi
     maksā+N+Pl+Dat: maksādõn
     maksā+N+Pl+Ins: maksādõks
     maksā+N+Pl+Ill: maksīž
     maksā+N+Pl+Ela: maksīst
